Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.  ORS 238.715 is amended to read:
238.715. (1) If the  Public Employees Retirement Board determines that a member of the Public
Employees Retirement System or any other person receiving a  monthly payment from the Public
Employees Retirement Fund  has received any amount in excess of the amounts that the member or
other person is entitled to under this chapter and ORS chapter  238A, the board may recover the
overpayment or other improperly made payment by:
(a) Reducing the monthly payment  to the member or other person for as many months as may
be determined by  the board to be necessary to recover the overpayment or other improperly made
payment; or
(b) Reducing  the monthly payment to the member or other person by an amount actuarially de-
termined to be adequate to recover the overpayment or other improperly  made payment during the
period during which the monthly payment will be made to the member or other person.
(2)(a) Any person who receives  a payment from the Public Employees Retirement Fund and who
is not entitled to receive that payment, including a member of the system who receives  an over-
payment, holds the improperly made  payment in trust subject to the board’s recovery of that pay-
ment under this section or by a civil action or other proceeding.
(b) The board may recover an improperly made payment in the manner provided  by subsection
(1) of this section from any  person who receives an improperly made payment from the fund and
who subsequently becomes entitled to receive a monthly payment from the fund.
(c) The board may recover  an improperly made payment by reducing any lump sum payment in
the amount necessary to recover the improperly made payment if a person who receives an  im-
properly made payment from the fund subsequently becomes entitled to receive a lump  sum payment
from the fund.
(3) Unless the member or other person receiving a monthly payment from the  fund authorizes
a greater reduction, the board  may not reduce the monthly payment made to a member or other
person under the provisions of subsection (1)  of this section by an amount that is equal to more than
10 percent of the monthly payment.
Enrolled Senate Bill 851 (SB 851-INTRO) Page 1
(4) Before reducing a benefit  to recover an overpayment or erroneous payment, or pursuing any
other collection action under this section, the board  shall give notice of the overpayment or erro-
neous payment to the person who received the payment. The  notice shall describe the manner in
which the person who received the payment may  appeal the board’s determination that an over-
payment or erroneous payment was  made, the action the board may take if the person does not re-
spond to the notice and the authority of the  board to assess interest, penalties or costs of collection.
(5) If the board determines that an overpayment  or erroneous payment was not caused by the
system or by a participating public employer, the board may assess interest  in an amount equal to
one percent per  month on the balance of the improperly made payment until the payment is fully
recovered. The board may also assess to  the member or other person all costs incurred by the sys-
tem in recovering the payment, including attorney fees. Interest and costs may be collected in  the
manner prescribed in subsections (1) and (2) of this section. The board may  waive the interest and
costs on an overpayment or other improperly made payment for good cause shown.
(6) Notwithstanding ORS 293.240, the board may waive the recovery of any payment or payments
made to a person who was not entitled to receive the payment or payments if the total amount  of
the overpayment or other improperly made payments is less than [ $50] $200.
(7) A payment made  to a person from the fund may not be recovered by the board unless within
six years after the date  that the payment was made the board has commenced proceedings to re-
cover the payment. For the purposes of subsection (1) of this section, the board shall be  considered
to have commenced proceedings to recover  the payment upon mailing of notice to the person re-
ceiving a monthly payment that the board has determined that  an overpayment or other improperly
made payment has been made.
(8) The remedies authorized under this section are supplemental to any other remedies  that may
be available to the board for recovery of amounts incorrectly paid from the fund  to members of the
system or other persons.
(9) The board shall adopt rules establishing the procedures to be followed by  the board in re-
covering overpayments and erroneous payments under this section.
SECTION 2.  ORS 238.450 is amended to read:
238.450. (1) Upon receiving an application for a retirement allowance or benefit from a member
of the Public Employees Retirement System and obtaining  information necessary for computation
of the retirement allowance or benefit to which the member is entitled upon retirement, the  system
shall provide  to the member a written computation of the retirement allowance or benefit to which
the member is entitled upon retirement and summary of the  information used in making that com-
putation.
(2) A member  of the system may dispute the accuracy of the information used by the system in
making the computation only by filing a written notice of dispute  with the system not later than
whichever of the following days occurs last:
(a) The 240th day after the date on which the computation and  information summary is provided
to the member pursuant to subsection (1) of this section.
(b) The 240th day after the date on which the  retirement allowance or benefit to which the
member is entitled first becomes payable.
(3) The filing of a notice of dispute under subsection (2) of this section extends the time allowed
for election of an optional form of retirement allowance or benefit until the 30th day after the con-
clusion of the  proceeding and any judicial review thereof if the proceeding or review results in a
change in the computation of the retirement allowance or benefit.
(4) Upon receiving a notice of dispute under subsection (2) of  this section, the system shall de-
termine the accuracy of the disputed information and make a written decision either affirming  the
accuracy of the information and  computation based thereon or changing the computation using
corrected information. The system shall provide  to the member a copy of the decision and a written
explanation of any applicable statutes and rules. The member is entitled to judicial review  of the
decision as provided in ORS  183.484 and rules of the Public Employees Retirement Board consistent
with applicable statutes.
Enrolled Senate Bill 851 (SB 851-INTRO) Page 2
(5) After the last  date for filing a written notice of dispute under subsection (2) of this section,
a participating public employer may not modify information that is provided to the system  and that
relates to  a member’s creditable service, retirement credit, salary, employee contributions or accu-
mulated unused sick leave, unless specifically required by one of the following circumstances:
(a) To comply with a judgment, administrative order, arbitration  award, conciliation agreement,
settlement agreement or other  legal agreement entered into after the last date for filing a written
notice of dispute under subsection (2) of this section;
(b) To comply with ORS 238.156 or 238A.150; [ or]
(c) To comply with a  verification of retirement data under ORS 238.285 that was sub-
mitted to the system before the member’s effective date of retirement; or
[(c)] (d) To  make a correction or modification as a result of a dispute under subsection (2) of this
section , or in response to the board’s request  under ORS 238.285 (5) for the purpose of a de-
termination under ORS 238.285 (2) or (4) .
(6) This section does not affect any authority of the system, on its own initiative, to correct  an
incorrect computation of any retirement allowance or benefit.
SECTION 3.  ORS 238.005, as amended by section 1, chapter 101, Oregon Laws  2024, is amended
to read:
238.005. For purposes of this chapter:
(1) “Active member” means a member who is presently employed by a participating public em-
ployer in a qualifying position and who  has completed the six-month period of service required by
ORS 238.015.
(2) “Annuity” means payments for life derived  from contributions made by a member as provided
in this chapter.
(3) “Board” means the Public Employees Retirement Board.
(4) “Calendar year” means 12 calendar months commencing on January 1 and  ending on De-
cember 31 following.
(5) “Continuous service”  means service not interrupted for more than five years, except that
such continuous service shall be computed without regard to interruptions in the case of:
(a) An employee who had returned to the service of  the employer as of January 1, 1945, and
who remained in that employment until having  established membership in the Public Employees
Retirement System.
(b) An employee who was  in the armed services on January 1, 1945, and returned to the service
of the employer within one year of the date of being otherwise than dishonorably  discharged and
remained in that employment  until having established membership in the Public Employees Retire-
ment System.
(6) “Creditable service” means any period of time during which an active member is being paid
a salary by a participating public employer and  for which benefits under this chapter are funded by
employer contributions and earnings  on the fund. For purposes of computing years of “creditable
service,” full months and major fractions of a month shall be considered  to be one-twelfth of a year
and shall be added to all full years. “Creditable service” includes all retirement  credit received by
a member.
(7) “Earliest service  retirement age” means the age attained by a member when the member
could first make application for retirement under the provisions of ORS 238.280.
(8) “Employee” means a person who performs services for a participating public employer,  in-
cluding persons considered employees of  a participating public employer under 26 U.S.C. 3121(d)(2),
as in effect on December 31, 2019, and public officers. “Employee” does not include:
(a) Persons engaged as independent contractors.
(b) Seasonal, emergency or casual workers whose periods of employment with  any public em-
ployer or public employers do not total 600 hours in any calendar year.
(c) Persons provided  sheltered employment or made-work by a public employer in an employment
or industries program maintained for the benefit of such persons.
Enrolled Senate Bill 851 (SB 851-INTRO) Page 3
(d) Persons employed and paid from federal funds received under a  federal program intended
primarily to alleviate unemployment. However, any such person shall be  considered an “employee”
if not otherwise excluded by paragraphs (a) to (c) of this subsection and the  public employer elects
to have the person so considered by an irrevocable written notice to the board.
(e) Persons who are employees of a  railroad, as defined in ORS 824.020, and who, as such em-
ployees, are included in a retirement plan  under federal railroad retirement statutes. This paragraph
shall be deemed to have been in effect since the inception of the system.
(f) Persons employed in positions classified  as post-doctoral scholar positions by a public uni-
versity listed in ORS 352.002, or by the Oregon Health and Science University, under ORS 350.370.
(9) “Final average salary” means whichever of the following is greater:
(a) The average salary per calendar year paid by one  or more participating public employers to
an employee who is  an active member of the system in three of the calendar years of membership
before the effective date of retirement of the  employee, in which three years the employee was paid
the highest salary. The three calendar years in which  the employee was paid the largest total salary
may include calendar years in which the employee was employed for less than a full  calendar year.
If the number of calendar years of active membership before the effective date  of retirement of the
employee is three or fewer, the final average salary for the employee is the average salary  per
calendar year paid by one or more participating public employers to the employee in all  of those
years, without regard to whether the employee was employed for the full calendar year.
(b) One-third of the total salary paid by  a participating public employer to an employee who is
an active member of the system in the last 36 calendar months  of active membership before the ef-
fective date of retirement of the employee.
(10) “Firefighter” does not include a volunteer firefighter, but does include:
(a) The State Fire Marshal, the chief deputy fire marshal and deputy state fire marshals;
(b) An employee of the State  Fire Marshal whose primary duties include fire investigation, fire
prevention, fire safety, fire control or fire suppression;
(c) An employee of the State Forestry  Department who is certified by the State Forester as a
professional wildland firefighter and whose primary duties  include the abatement of uncontrolled
fires as described in ORS 477.064; and
(d) An employee of the Oregon Military Department whose primary duties include  fighting
structural, aircraft, wildland or other fires.
(11) “Fiscal year” means 12 calendar  months commencing on July 1 and ending on June 30 fol-
lowing.
(12) “Fund” means the Public Employees Retirement Fund.
(13) “Inactive member” means a member who  is not employed in a qualifying position, whose
membership has not been terminated in the manner described by  ORS 238.095 and who is not retired
for service or disability.
(14) “Institution of higher education”  means a public university listed in ORS 352.002, the
Oregon Health and Science University and a community college, as defined in ORS 341.005.
(15) “Major fraction of a month” means a month:
(a) In which an active member is  employed for more than one-half of the total calendar
days in that calendar month; and
(b) In which the member is being paid  a salary by a participating public employer for
hours worked in that calendar month.
[(15)] (16) “Member” means a person who has established membership in the system  and whose
membership has not been terminated as described in ORS 238.095. “Member” includes active,  inac-
tive and retired members.
[(16)] (17) “Member account” means the regular account and the variable account.
[(17)] (18) “Normal retirement age” means:
(a) For a person who establishes  membership in the system before January 1, 1996, as described
in ORS 238.430, 55 years of age if the employee retires at that age as a police officer  or firefighter
or 58 years of age if the employee retires at that age as other than a police officer or firefighter.
Enrolled Senate Bill 851 (SB 851-INTRO) Page 4
(b) For a person who establishes membership in the system on or after January 1, 1996,  as de-
scribed in ORS 238.430, 55 years of age if the employee retires at  that age as a police officer or
firefighter or 60 years of age if the employee retires at that age as other  than a police officer or
firefighter.
[(18)] (19) “Pension” means annual payments for life derived from contributions by one or  more
public employers.
[(19)] (20) “Police officer” includes:
(a) Employees of institutions defined  in ORS 421.005 as Department of Corrections institutions
whose duties, as assigned by the Director of the Department of  Corrections, include the custody of
persons committed to  the custody of or transferred to the Department of Corrections and employees
of the Department of Corrections who were classified as police officers on or before  July 27, 1989,
whether or not such classification was authorized by law.
(b) Employees of the Department  of State Police who are classified as police officers, forensic
scientists or evidence technicians by the Superintendent of State Police.
(c) Employees of the Oregon  Liquor and Cannabis Commission who are classified as regulatory
specialists by the administrator of the commission.
(d) Sheriffs and those deputy sheriffs or other employees of a sheriff  whose duties, as classified
by the sheriff, are the regular duties of police officers or corrections officers.
(e) Police  chiefs and police personnel of a city who are classified as police officers by the
council or other governing body of the city.
(f) Police officers who are commissioned by a university under ORS 352.121 or 353.125 and  who
are classified as police officers by the university.
(g) Parole and probation officers employed by the Department  of Corrections, parole and pro-
bation officers who are transferred to county employment under ORS 423.549 and  adult parole and
probation officers, as defined in  ORS 181A.355, who are classified as police officers for the purposes
of this chapter by the county governing body. If a county classifies adult parole  and probation offi-
cers  as  police officers for the purposes of this chapter, and the employees so classified are repres-
ented by a labor organization, any proposal by the county to change that  classification or to cease
to classify adult  parole and probation officers as police officers for the purposes of this chapter is
a mandatory subject of bargaining.
(h) Police officers appointed under ORS 276.021 or 276.023.
(i) Employees of the Port of Portland who are classified as airport police by the Board  of Com-
missioners of the Port of Portland.
(j) Employees of  the State Department of Agriculture who are classified as livestock police of-
ficers by the Director of Agriculture.
(k) Employees of the Department of Public Safety Standards and Training who are  classified by
the department as other than secretarial or clerical personnel.
(L) Investigators of the Criminal Justice Division of the Department of Justice.
(m) Corrections officers as defined in ORS 181A.355.
(n) Employees of the Oregon State Lottery Commission who are classified by  the Director of the
Oregon State Lottery as enforcement agents pursuant to ORS 461.110.
(o) The Director of the Department of Corrections.
(p) An employee who for seven consecutive years has been classified as a  police officer as de-
fined by this section, and who  is employed or transferred by the Department of Corrections to fill
a position designated by  the Director of the Department of Corrections as being eligible for police
officer  status.
(q) An employee of the Department of Corrections classified as a police officer on  or prior to
July 27, 1989,  whether or not that classification was authorized by law, as long as the employee
remains in the position  held on July 27, 1989. The initial classification of an employee under a sys-
tem implemented pursuant to ORS 240.190 does not affect police officer status.
Enrolled Senate Bill 851 (SB 851-INTRO) Page 5
(r) Employees of a school district who are appointed and duly  sworn members of a law
enforcement agency of the  district as provided in ORS 332.531 or otherwise employed full-time as
police officers commissioned by the district.
(s) Employees at  youth correction facilities and juvenile detention facilities under ORS 419A.050,
419A.052 and 420.005 to 420.915 who are required  to hold valid Oregon teaching licenses and who
have supervisory, control or teaching responsibilities over juveniles committed to the custody of  the
Department of Corrections or the Oregon Youth Authority.
(t) Employees at youth correction facilities as defined in ORS 420.005  whose primary job de-
scription involves the custody, control, treatment, investigation or  supervision of juveniles placed
in such facilities.
(u) Employees of the Oregon Youth Authority  who are classified as juvenile parole and pro-
bation officers.
(v) Employees of the Department of Human Services who are  prohibited from striking under
ORS 243.726 and whose duties include the  care of residents of residential facilities, as defined in
ORS 443.400, that house individuals with intellectual or developmental disabilities.
(w) Employees appointed as judicial marshals under ORS 1.177 who are certified  under ORS
181A.540.
(x) Certified parole and probation officers employed by  the State Board of Parole and Post-
Prison Supervision.
(y) District attorneys and deputy district attorneys.
[(20)] (21) “Prior service credit” means credit provided under ORS  238.442 or under ORS 238.225
(2) to (6) (1999 Edition).
[(21)] (22) “Public employer” means the state, one of its agencies  or any city, county, municipal
or public corporation, political subdivision of  the state or instrumentality thereof, or an agency
created  by  one or more such governmental organizations to provide governmental services. For
purposes of this chapter,  such agency created by one or more governmental organizations is a gov-
ernmental instrumentality and a legal entity with  power to enter into contracts, hold property and
sue and be sued.
[(22)] (23) “Qualifying  position” means one or more jobs with one or more participating public
employers in which an employee performs 600 or more hours of service in a full calendar  year, or
would perform 600 or more hours of service if the employee were employed for  the full calendar
year, excluding  any service in a job for which a participating public employer does not provide
benefits under this chapter pursuant to an application made under ORS 238.035.
[(23)] (24) “Regular account” means the account established for each active and inactive member
under ORS 238.250.
[(24)] (25) “Retired member” means a member who is retired for service or disability.
[(25)] (26) “Retirement credit” means a period of time  that is treated as creditable service for
the purposes of this chapter.
[(26)(a)] (27)(a) “Salary” means the remuneration paid an employee in cash out of the funds of
a public employer in return for  services to the employer, plus the monetary value, as determined
by the Public Employees Retirement Board,  of whatever living quarters, board, lodging, fuel, laundry
and other advantages the employer furnishes the employee in return for services.
(b) “Salary” includes but is not limited to:
(A) Payments of employee and  employer money into a deferred compensation plan, which are
deemed salary paid in each month of deferral;
(B) The amount of participation in a tax-sheltered or deferred annuity, which is  deemed salary
paid in each month of participation;
(C) Retroactive payments described in ORS 238.008;
(D) Wages of a deceased member paid to a surviving spouse or dependent  children under ORS
652.190; and
Enrolled Senate Bill 851 (SB 851-INTRO) Page 6
(E) The full amount of  required employee contributions under ORS 238A.330 that are paid by the
employer  on  behalf of its employees under ORS 238A.335 (2)(b), solely for the purpose of computing
a member’s final average salary, and not for any other purpose.
(c) “Salary” or “other advantages” does not include:
(A) Travel or any other expenses incidental to employer’s business which is  reimbursed by the
employer;
(B) Payments for insurance coverage by an employer on behalf of employee or employee and
dependents, for which the employee has no cash option;
(C) Payments made on account of an employee’s death;
(D) Any lump sum payment for accumulated unused sick leave;
(E) Any accelerated payment of an employment contract for a future period or an  advance
against future wages;
(F) Any  retirement incentive, retirement severance pay, retirement bonus or retirement
gratuitous payment;
(G) Payments for periods of leave of absence after the date the employer  and employee have
agreed that no future services qualifying pursuant to ORS  238.015 (3) will be performed, except for
sick leave and vacation;
(H) Payments for  instructional services rendered to public universities listed in ORS 352.002 or
the Oregon Health and Science University when such services are in excess of full-time employment
subject to this chapter. A person employed under a contract  for less than 12 months is subject to
this subparagraph only for the months to which the contract pertains;
(I) Payments made by an employer for insurance coverage provided to a domestic  partner of an
employee;
(J) Compensation described and  authorized under ORS 341.556 that is not paid by the community
college employing the faculty member;
(K) Compensation described and authorized under ORS 352.232 that is  not paid by the public
university employing the officer or employee;
(L) Compensation described and authorized under ORS 353.270 that is  not paid by Oregon
Health and Science University; or
(M) For years beginning on or after January 1, 2020, any  amount in excess of $195,000 for a
calendar year. If any period over which salary is determined is less than 12 months, the $195,000
limitation for that period shall be multiplied by a fraction, the numerator of which is the  number
of months in the determination period and the denominator of which is 12. On January 1 of each
year, the board shall adjust the dollar limit provided by this subparagraph to reflect any percentage
changes in the Consumer Price Index for All Urban  Consumers, West Region (All Items), as pub-
lished by the Bureau of Labor Statistics of the United States Department of Labor.
[(27)] (28) “School year” means the period beginning July 1 and ending June 30 next following.
[(28)] (29) “System” means the Public Employees Retirement System.
[(29)] (30) “Variable account”  means the account established for a member who participates in
the Variable Annuity Account under ORS 238.260.
[(30)] (31) “Vested” means being an active member  of the system in each of five calendar years.
[(31)] (32) “Volunteer firefighter” means a firefighter whose position normally requires less  than
600 hours of service per year.
SECTION 4.
 ORS 238A.140 is amended to read:
238A.140. (1) An active member of the pension program accrues one year of retirement  credit
for each complete year of service and one-twelfth of a year of retirement  credit for each full month
and each major fraction of a month of service.
(2) An active member who is a school employee shall be credited with  at least six months of
retirement credit if the member performs service  for a major fraction of each month of a school year
that falls between January 1 and June 30, and  at least six months of retirement credit if the member
performs service for a major fraction of each  month of a school year that falls between July 1 and
December 31.
Enrolled Senate Bill 851 (SB 851-INTRO) Page 7
(3) When an eligible employee becomes a member under ORS 238A.100, the board shall credit
the eligible employee  with retirement credit for the period of employment required of the employee
under ORS 238A.100.
(4) A member may not accrue more than one full year of retirement credit in  any calendar year.
(5) For purposes of this section[ ,]:
(a) “Major fraction of a month” or “major fraction of each month” means a month:
(A) In which  an active member is employed for more than one-half of the total calendar
days in that calendar month; and
(B) In which the member is being paid a salary by a participating public employer  for
hours worked in that calendar month.
(b) “School employee” means:
[(a)] (A) A person  who is employed by a common school district, a union high school district
or an education service district;
[(b)] (B) An employee of an institution of higher education who is  engaged in teaching or other
school activity; and
[(c)] (C) An employee of the Department of  Human Services, the Oregon Youth Authority, the
Department of Corrections or the State Board of Education who is engaged in  teaching or other
school activity at an institution supervised by the authority, board or department.
SECTION 5.
 ORS 238.148 is amended to read:
238.148. (1) A member of the Public Employees Retirement System who is a police officer is en-
titled to receive retirement credit as provided in subsection (2) of this section if:
(a) The member was employed as a public  safety officer by another state, or political subdivision
of another state, before being employed in a position that entitled  the member to credit in the sys-
tem; and
(b) The member  makes the payment required by subsection (2) of this section within the time
specified by that subsection.
(2) Except as provided  in subsection (3) of this section, a member of the system employed as a
police officer who meets the requirements of subsection (1)  of this section is entitled to receive re-
tirement credit for the period of the member’s service with  another state, or political subdivision
of another state, not to exceed a maximum of four years, if the member within  90 days of the
member’s effective date of retirement:
(a) Applies in writing to the Public Employees Retirement Board for such retirement credit;
(b) Provides written verification to the board from the other  state, or political subdivision of the
other state, that employed the member, verifying the period of time  that the member served as a
public safety officer in the other state; and
(c) Pays to the board, in a lump sum, for each year of retirement credit applied for under  this
section, an amount determined by the board to represent the full cost to the system  of providing the
retirement credit to the member, including  all administrative costs incurred by the system in proc-
essing the application for acquisition of the retirement credit.
(3) A member may  not receive retirement credit under the provisions of this section for any
period of service with another state, or political subdivision of another state, if  the member is en-
titled to a pension or retirement allowance by reason of that service under a public plan  or system
offered by the other state or by a political subdivision of the other state.
(4) For the purposes of this section, “public  safety officer” means a person who serves in a po-
sition with another state, or political subdivision of another state, that is the  other state’s equiv-
alent of a position described in ORS 238.005 [ (19)] (20).
SECTION 6.
 ORS 238.580 is amended to read:
238.580. (1) Except as provided in subsection (3)  of this section, ORS 238.005 (4) and [ (26)] (27),
238.025, 238.078, 238.082, 238.092, 238.115 (1), 238.250, 238.255, 238.260, 238.350,  238.362, 238.364,
238.372 to 238.384, 238.410, 238.415, 238.420, 238.445,  238.458, 238.460, 238.465, 238.475, 238.600,
238.605, 238.610, 238.618, 238.630, 238.635, 238.645, 238.650,  238.655, 238.660, 238.665, 238.670 and
Enrolled Senate Bill 851 (SB 851-INTRO) Page 8
238.705 and the increases provided by ORS 238.366 for members  of the system who are serving as
other than police officers or firefighters apply in respect to service as a judge member.
(2) This chapter applies in respect to persons described in ORS 238.505 (1) and in  respect to
service as a judge member only as specifically provided in ORS 238.500 to 238.585.
(3) ORS 238.005 [ (26)(c)(M)] (27)(c)(M) does not apply in respect to service as a judge member.
SECTION 7.  ORS 238.608 is amended to read:
238.608. (1) The Public Employees Retirement Board shall conduct a study  of the life expectancy
of members of the Public Employees Retirement System in the categories described in subsection (2)
of this section. If the board determines that members  in the categories described in subsection (2)
of this section have a life expectancy that is substantially shorter than the life expectancy of mem-
bers of the system generally, the  board shall adopt and use separate actuarial equivalency factor
tables under ORS 238.607 for the purpose of computing the payments to be  made to members in the
categories described in subsection (2) of this section and to  the beneficiaries and alternate payees
of those  members. Any actuarial equivalency factor tables adopted under this section shall first be-
come effective January 1, 2005.
(2) The provisions of this section apply to members of the system who are  defined as firefighters
under ORS 238.005 or as police officers under ORS 238.005 [ (19)(a)] (20)(a), (b), (d), (e),  (f), (g), (L),
(m), (o), (p) or (q).
SECTION 8.
ORS 238A.010 is repealed.
Passed by Senate February 11, 2025
..................................................................................
Obadiah Rutledge, Secretary of Senate
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Passed by House April 30, 2025
..................................................................................
Julie Fahey, Speaker of House
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tobias Read, Secretary of State
Enrolled Senate Bill 851 (SB 851-INTRO) Page 9